Utah statutes.
53B-17-801.   Title -- Definitions.
(1)  This part is known as "Rocky Mountain Center for Occupational and
Environmental Health."
(2)  As used in this part:
(a)  "Affected populations" include:
(i)  employees;
(ii)  employers;
(iii)  insurers;
(iv)  professionals or professional organizations related to occupational and
environmental health;
(v)  government agencies; and
(vi)  outside academic institutions.
(b)  "Board" means the Rocky Mountain Center for Occupational and
Environmental Health Advisory Board created in Section 53B-17-803.
(c)  "Center" means the Rocky Mountain Center for Occupational and
Environmental Health.
(d)  "Director" means the director of the center.
(e)  "University" means the University of Utah.
